Utah statutes.
17B-1-310.   Quorum of board of trustees -- Meetings of the board.

(1) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a majority of the board of trustees constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business, and action by a majority of a quorum constitutes action of the board.

(ii)  Except as otherwise required by law, an otherwise valid action of the board is not made invalid because of the method chosen by the board to take or memorialize the action.

(b) (i)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b)(ii), a board may adopt bylaws or other rules that require more than a majority to constitute a quorum or that require action by more than a majority of a quorum to constitute action by the board.

(ii)  Except for board action to dispose of real property owned by the local district, board bylaws or rules may not require a vote of more than two-thirds vote of the board to constitute board action.

(2)  The board of trustees shall hold such regular and special meetings as the board determines at a location that the board determines.

(3)  Each meeting of the board of trustees shall comply with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.

